Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
WATER QUALITY PERMIT
SECTION 1.  ORS 468B.050 is amended to read:
468B.050. (1) Except as provided  in ORS 468B.053 or 468B.215, without holding a permit from the
Director of the Department of Environmental Quality or  the State Department of Agriculture, which
permit shall specify applicable effluent limitations, a person may not:
(a) Discharge any wastes into the waters of the state  from any industrial or commercial estab-
lishment or activity or any disposal system.
(b) Construct, install, modify or operate any disposal system or  part thereof or any extension
or addition thereto.
(c) Increase in volume or strength any  wastes in excess of the permissive discharges specified
under an existing permit.
(d) Construct, install, operate or conduct any  industrial, commercial, confined animal feeding
operation  or  other establishment or activity or any extension or modification thereof or addition
thereto, the operation or conduct of which would cause an increase in the discharge of wastes  into
the waters of the state or which would  otherwise alter the physical, chemical or biological proper-
ties of any waters of the state in any manner not already lawfully authorized.
(e) Construct or use any new outlet for the discharge of any wastes into the  waters of the state.
(2) The Department  of Environmental Quality or the State Department of Agriculture may issue
a permit under this section as an individual, general or watershed permit. A permit may  be issued
to a class of persons using the procedures for issuance of an order or for the adoption of a  rule.
Notwithstanding the definition of  “order” or “rule” provided in ORS 183.310, in issuing a general
or watershed permit by order pursuant  to this section, the State Department of Agriculture or De-
partment of Environmental Quality:
(a) Is not required to direct the order to a named person or named persons; and
(b) May include in the order agency directives, standards, regulations and statements of general
applicability that implement, interpret or prescribe law or policy.
Enrolled Senate Bill 85 (SB 85-B) Page 1
(3) When deciding whether  to issue a permit to a confined animal feeding operation under
this section, the Department of Environmental Quality  or the State Department of Agricul-
ture shall consider any relevant determination  by the Water Resources Department pursu-
ant to section 7 (2) of this 2023 Act.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section,  the Department of Environmental
Quality or the State Department of Agriculture may not issue a general  NPDES or WPCF
permit to a new large confined animal feeding operation that:
(a) Is located in a ground water management area declared under ORS 468B.180; and
(b) Applies manure,  litter, wastewater or processed waste to land within the ground wa-
ter management area.
(5) Subsection (4) of this section does not apply to the issuance of  water quality permits
to regulate stormwater.
[(3)] (6)  The State Department of Agriculture or the Department of Environmental Quality may
define “confined animal feeding operation” by rule for purposes of implementing this section.
(7) As used in this section:
(a) “New large confined animal  feeding operation” has the meaning given that term in
ORS 468B.215.
(b) “NPDES” and “WPCF” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 561.255.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 468B.215 is amended to read:
468B.215. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Expanding confined animal feeding operation” means a confined animal  feeding op-
eration that is expanding operational size into a new tier, as described in ORS 561.255 (2).
(b) “Expanding large confined animal feeding operation” means a large confined animal
feeding operation in the largest tier described in  ORS 561.255 (2) that is expanding the ca-
pacity of the large confined  animal feeding operation to manage animal wastes, consistent
with the conditions of a permit issued under  ORS 468B.050, to more than 20 percent of the
capacity of the large confined animal feeding operation.
(c) “Large confined animal feeding  operation” has the meaning given that term in ORS
561.255.
(d) “New confined animal feeding operation”  means a confined animal feeding operation
that is seeking a permit under ORS 468B.050 to operate on a parcel of land on which  no
confined animal feeding operation has previously operated.
(e) “New large confined animal feeding operation” means  a large confined animal feeding
operation that is seeking a permit under ORS 468B.050 to operate on a parcel of land  on
which no confined animal feeding operation has previously operated.
(f) “NPDES” and “WPCF” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 561.255.
[(1)] (2)  Any person operating a  confined animal feeding operation or concentrated animal
feeding operation under an NPDES  or WPCF permit shall annually pay a fee for a confined animal
feeding operation permit or concentrated animal  feeding operation permit as provided by State De-
partment of Agriculture rules adopted under ORS 561.255. [ As used in this  subsection, “NPDES” and
“WPCF” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 561.255. ]
[(2)] (3) Except for an animal feeding operation subject to regulation under 33 U.S.C. 1342, a fee
shall not be assessed to nor a permit required under  ORS 468B.050 (1)(d) of confined animal feeding
operations of four months or less duration or  that do not have waste water control facilities. A
confined animal feeding operation of four months or less duration  or that does not have waste water
control facilities is subject to all requirements of ORS chapters 468, 468A and 468B if found  to be
discharging wastes into the waters of the state.
(4)(a) Before submitting an application for a permit under  ORS 468B.050 for a new large
confined animal feeding operation or an expanding large confined animal feeding operation,
an applicant shall:
(A) Request that the  Department of Environmental Quality or the State Department of
Agriculture schedule a preliminary consultation.
Enrolled Senate Bill 85 (SB 85-B) Page 2
(B) Participate in the preliminary consultation.
(b) Before  scheduling the preliminary consultation, the Department of Environmental
Quality or the State Department of Agriculture shall:
(A) Notify the governing bodies of  all federally recognized Indian tribes in this state; and
(B) Consult with the governing bodies, upon request by the governing bodies.
(c) The preliminary consultation must:
(A) Include the applicant, the Department of Environmental Quality, the State  Depart-
ment of Agriculture, the Water Resources Department  and other relevant state agencies,
as determined by the Department of Environmental Quality and the State Department of
Agriculture.
(B) Occur not more than 45 days after the request is received.
(5)(a) In addition to other  permit conditions, a person that applies for a permit under
ORS 468B.050 for:
(A) A confined animal feeding operation shall submit a water  supply plan, as described
in section 7 of this 2023 Act, with the application.
(B) A new large confined animal feeding operation shall send individual notice  of the
public comment period for the  permit, by mail, to all persons on record as owning property
within one-half  mile of the parcel of land on which the new large confined animal feeding
operation is proposed to be located.
(b) The Department of Environmental Quality and State Department of Agriculture  may
not consider a person’s lack of receipt of  the notice described in paragraph (a)(B) of this
subsection when deciding whether to approve or  deny an application for a permit under ORS
468B.050.
[(3)] (6)  The Department of Environmental Quality or the State Department of Agriculture may
impose on the permit required for a confined animal  feeding operation only those conditions neces-
sary to ensure that :
(a) Wastes are [ disposed of ] used in a manner that does not cause pollution of the surface and
ground waters of the state.
(b) The confined animal feeding operation is in compliance with water quality standards.
(c) The quantity  of water necessary to supply the level and duration of the water needs
of the confined animal feeding operation, including any  ancillary operations of the confined
animal feeding operation described in the permit, is legally authorized.
(7) After being issued a permit under ORS 468B.050, a person  may not bring animals to
a new confined animal feeding operation,  or to newly constructed or installed facilities for
an expanding confined animal feeding operation, until after the State Department of Agri-
culture:
(a) Inspects the new confined animal feeding  operation or expanding confined animal
feeding operation; and
(b) Confirms that the construction  or installation of the waste management system and
relevant operational functions of the new  confined animal feeding operation or expanding
confined animal feeding operation comply with the conditions of the water quality permit.
(8) In addition to monitoring and reporting requirements under  an NPDES or WPCF
permit, a person that holds a permit under ORS  468B.050 for a confined animal feeding op-
eration and sends manure, litter  or processed wastewater to a person that holds a nutrient
application permit described in section 5 of this 2023 Act shall maintain records of  the nu-
trient application permit, including the number of the nutrient application permit.
[(4)] (9)  A permit for a confined animal feeding operation may  be revoked or modified by the
Department of Environmental Quality or  the State Department of Agriculture or may be terminated
upon request by the permit holder. An  animal feeding operation may be inspected for compliance
with water quality laws and regulations by the Department of Environmental Quality  or the State
Department of Agriculture.
SECTION 3.
The provisions of ORS 468B.215 (5) and (7) apply to:
Enrolled Senate Bill 85 (SB 85-B) Page 3
(1) New confined animal feeding operations and expanding confined animal feeding  oper-
ations, as defined in ORS 468B.215, that apply for  a permit under ORS 468B.050 on or after
the effective date of this 2023 Act.
(2) Large confined animal feeding operations, as described in ORS 561.255  (1), that renew
permits under ORS 468B.050 on or after July 1, 2024.
(3) Small confined animal feeding operations and medium confined animal feeding  oper-
ations, as described in ORS 561.255 (1), that renew permits  under ORS 468B.050 on or after
July 1, 2025.
NUTRIENT APPLICATION PERMIT
SECTION 4. Section 5 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS  468B.200 to
468B.230.
SECTION 5. (1) The State Department of Agriculture may issue a nutrient application
permit.
(2) As applicable, the permit must concern, but need not only concern:
(a) The rate of nutrient application.
(b) The source of the nutrients.
(c) The placement of the nutrients.
(d) The timing of nutrient application.
(e) The volume of wastewater applied to the surface of the lands per time period.
(3) Except as authorized under an NPDES  or WPCF permit, a person may apply manure,
litter, wastewater or processed waste from a  confined animal feeding operation on lands in
a ground water management area declared under ORS 468B.180 only if the person holds  a
permit under this section.
(4) A person that holds a permit under this section shall provide the confined  animal
feeding operation from which the person receives manure, litter, wastewater or  processed
waste with a copy of the permit.
(5) The department may adopt rules to implement this section, including rules that  es-
tablish:
(a) Recordkeeping requirements for a person that holds a permit under this section.
(b) Criteria for inspections to ensure compliance with this section.
(c) Fees for permits under this section.
(6) As used in this section, “NPDES” and “WPCF” have the meanings given those  terms
in ORS 561.255.
WATER SUPPLY PLAN
SECTION 6.
Section 7 of this 2023 Act is added to and made  a part of ORS chapter 468B.
SECTION 7. (1) A person that applies for a permit under ORS 468B.050  for a confined
animal feeding operation operating under an NPDES or  WPCF permit, as described in ORS
468B.215 (2), shall submit with the application a water supply plan that identifies  all sources
of the water that will be used to supply  the level and duration of the water needs of the
confined animal feeding operation, including any ancillary operations of the confined animal
feeding operation, as described in the application.
(2) After receiving a water supply plan described in  subsection (1) of this section, the
Department of Environmental Quality or the State  Department of Agriculture shall request
that the Water Resources  Department review the water supply plan to determine whether
the water uses identified in the water supply plan are legally authorized and allowable.
(3) Not more  than 45 days after receiving a request described in subsection (2) of this
section, the Water Resources Department shall provide a determination described  in sub-
Enrolled Senate Bill 85 (SB 85-B) Page 4
section (2) of this section to the Department of Environmental Quality or  the State Depart-
ment of Agriculture.
(4) A water supply plan for a confined animal feeding  operation that uses stockwater as
described in ORS  537.545 (1)(a) must use animal water consumption guidelines provided by
the State Department of Agriculture to estimate the gallons per day that the confined animal
feeding operation will use.
(5) The Water Resources Department may  recommend that the Department of Environ-
mental Quality or the State Department of Agriculture  condition a permit under ORS
468B.050 on one or more of the following:
(a) Requiring a confined animal feeding operation that uses  stockwater, as described in
ORS 537.545 (1)(a), or a person renewing a permit under ORS 468B.050 for a  confined animal
feeding operation, to:
(A) Install water metering and submetering devices concerning  a new or expanding pro-
duction area; and
(B) Maintain quarterly water use data  that the Water Resources Department may in-
spect annually, upon request by the department.
(b) Prohibiting an expanding confined animal feeding operation, as defined in  ORS
468B.215, within a critical  ground water area designated by order or pursuant to ORS 537.730
from increasing the confined animal feeding operation’s use of water per day under  the ex-
emption described in ORS 537.545 (1)(a) by more than the limit described in ORS 537.545
(1)(a).
(6) When making a determination described in subsection (2)  of this section, the Water
Resources Department may not consider a change of use, place of use or point  of diversion
as legally authorized until the change is  approved pursuant to an order described in ORS
540.530 that is final as a matter of law or is not subject to a pending appeal.
(7) A determination under subsection (2) of this section may not be considered:
(a) An authorization of water use or water rights.
(b) A final order or ruling.
(8) A person  that renews a permit under ORS 468B.050 for a confined animal feeding op-
eration operating under an NPDES or WPCF permit,  as described in ORS 468B.215 (2), shall
attest upon renewal of the permit that the water supply plan for the confined animal feeding
operation that was previously approved under this section is compliant with this section.
SECTION 8.
 Section 7 of this 2023 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 7.  (1) A  person that applies for a permit under ORS 468B.050 for a confined animal feeding
operation operating under an NPDES or WPCF permit, as described in ORS 468B.215 (2), shall sub-
mit with the application  a water supply plan that identifies all sources of the water that will be used
to supply the level and duration of the water needs of the confined  animal feeding operation, in-
cluding any ancillary operations of the confined animal feeding operation, as  described in the ap-
plication.
(2) After receiving a water supply plan described in subsection  (1) of this section, the Depart-
ment of Environmental  Quality or the State Department of Agriculture shall request that the Water
Resources Department review the water supply plan  to determine whether the water uses identified
in the water supply plan are legally authorized and allowable.
(3) Not  more than 45 days after receiving a request described in subsection (2) of this section,
the Water  Resources Department shall provide a determination described in subsection (2) of this
section to the Department of Environmental Quality or the State Department of Agriculture.
(4) A water supply plan for a  confined animal feeding operation that uses stockwater as de-
scribed in ORS 537.545 (1)(a) must  use animal water consumption guidelines provided by the State
Department of Agriculture to estimate the gallons per day that the confined animal feeding  opera-
tion will use.
Enrolled Senate Bill 85 (SB 85-B) Page 5
(5) The Water Resources Department may  recommend that the Department of Environmental
Quality or the State Department of Agriculture condition a permit under ORS 468B.050 on [ one or
more of the following: ]
[(a)] requiring a confined animal feeding operation  that uses stockwater, as described in ORS
537.545 (1)(a), or a person renewing a permit under ORS 468B.050 for a confined animal  feeding op-
eration,  to:
[(A)] (a)  Install water metering and submetering devices concerning a  new or expanding pro-
duction area; and
[(B)] (b) Maintain quarterly water  use data that the Water Resources Department may inspect
annually, upon request by the department.
[(b) Prohibiting an expanding confined  animal feeding operation, as defined in ORS 468B.215,
within a critical ground  water area designated by order or pursuant to ORS 537.730 from increasing
the confined animal feeding operation’s use of water per day under the exemption described in ORS
537.545 (1)(a) by more than the limit described in ORS 537.545 (1)(a). ]
(6) When  making a determination described in subsection (2) of this section, the Water Re-
sources Department may not consider  a change of use, place of use or point of diversion as legally
authorized until the change is approved pursuant to an order described in  ORS 540.530 that is final
as a matter of law or is not subject to a pending appeal.
(7) A determination under subsection (2) of this section may not be considered:
(a) An authorization of water use or water rights.
(b) A final order or ruling.
(8) A person that renews a permit under ORS 468B.050 for a  confined animal feeding operation
operating under an NPDES or WPCF permit, as described in ORS 468B.215 (2),  shall attest upon
renewal of the permit that the water supply plan for the confined animal feeding operation that was
previously approved under this section is compliant with this section.
SECTION 9.
The amendments to section 7 of this 2023 Act by section 8 of this 2023 Act
become operative on September 15, 2027.
STOCKWATER EXEMPTION
SECTION 10.  ORS 537.545 is amended to read:
537.545. (1) [ No] A  registration, certificate  of registration, application for a permit, permit, cer-
tificate of completion or ground water right certificate under ORS 537.505 to 537.795  and 537.992 is
not required for the use of ground water for:
(a) Stockwatering purposes , unless the use exceeds 12,000 gallons per day and occurs  at a
new confined animal feeding operation, as defined in ORS 468B.215 ;
(b) Watering any lawn or noncommercial garden not exceeding one-half acre in area;
(c) Watering the lawns, grounds and fields not exceeding 10 acres in area of schools  located
within a critical ground water area established pursuant to ORS 537.730 to 537.740;
(d) Single or group domestic purposes in an amount not exceeding 15,000 gallons a day;
(e) Down-hole heat exchange purposes;
(f) Any single industrial or  commercial purpose in an amount not exceeding 5,000 gallons a day;
or
(g) Land application, so long as the ground water:
(A) Has first been appropriated and used under a permit or certificate  issued under ORS 537.625
or 537.630 for a water right issued  for industrial purposes or a water right authorizing use of water
for confined animal feeding purposes;
(B) Is reused for irrigation  purposes and the period of irrigation is a period during which the
reused water has never been discharged to the waters of the state; and
(C) Is applied pursuant  to a permit issued by the Department of Environmental Quality or the
State Department of Agriculture  under either ORS 468B.050 to construct and operate a disposal
system or ORS 468B.215 to operate a confined animal feeding operation.
Enrolled Senate Bill 85 (SB 85-B) Page 6
(2) A ground water use for a purpose that is exempt under subsection (1) of this section,  to the
extent that the use is beneficial, constitutes a  right to appropriate ground water equal to that es-
tablished by a ground water right certificate issued under ORS 537.700.
(3) Except  for the use of water under subsection (1)(g) of this section, the Water Resources
Commission by rule may require any person or  public agency using ground water for any such
purpose to furnish information with regard to such ground  water and the use thereof. For a use of
water described in subsection  (1)(g) of this section, the Department of Environmental Quality or the
State Department of Agriculture  shall provide to the Water Resources Department a copy of the
permit issued under ORS 468B.050 or 468B.215 authorizing the land application of ground  water for
reuse. The permit  shall provide the information regarding the place of use of such water and the
nature of the beneficial reuse.
(4) If it is necessary for the Water Resources Department to regulate the use or distribution  of
ground water, including uses for purposes that are exempt under subsection  (1) of this section, the
department shall use as a priority date for the exempt uses  the date indicated in the log for the well
filed with the department under ORS 537.765 or other  documentation provided by the well owner
showing when water use began.
(5) The  person licensed under ORS 537.747 or permitted under ORS 537.753 (4) that constructs
a well  to allow ground water use for a purpose that is exempt under subsection (1) of this section
shall provide the Water Resources Department with a  map showing the exact location of the well
on the tax  lot. The person licensed under ORS 537.747 or permitted under ORS 537.753 (4) that
constructs a well shall provide a map required by  this subsection to the department, along with the
well log required by ORS 537.765, no later  than 30 days after the well is completed. The map must
be prepared in accordance with standards  established by the department. The map and well log must
be accompanied by the fee described in subsection (6) of this section to  record the exempt ground
water use.
(6) The Water Resources Department shall collect  a fee of $300 for recording an exempt ground
water use under subsection (5) of this section. Moneys  from fees collected under this subsection
shall be deposited to  the credit of the Water Resources Department Water Right Operating Fund.
Notwithstanding ORS 536.009,  moneys deposited to the fund under this subsection shall be used for
the purposes of evaluating ground water supplies, conducting  ground water studies, carrying out
ground water monitoring, processing ground water data and  the administration and enforcement of
this subsection and subsections (3), (5) and (7) of this section.
(7) The Water Resources  Commission shall adopt rules to implement, administer and enforce
subsections (5) and (6) of this section.
SECTION 11.  ORS 537.545, as amended by section 10 of this 2023 Act, is amended to read:
537.545. (1) A registration, certificate of registration, application for a  permit, permit, certificate
of completion or  ground water right certificate under ORS 537.505 to 537.795 and 537.992 is not re-
quired for the use of ground water for:
(a) Stockwatering purposes[ , unless the use exceeds 12,000  gallons per day and occurs at a new
confined animal feeding operation, as defined in ORS 468B.215 ];
(b) Watering any lawn or noncommercial garden not exceeding one-half acre in area;
(c) Watering the lawns, grounds and fields not exceeding 10 acres in area of schools  located
within a critical ground water area established pursuant to ORS 537.730 to 537.740;
(d) Single or group domestic purposes in an amount not exceeding 15,000 gallons a day;
(e) Down-hole heat exchange purposes;
(f) Any single industrial or  commercial purpose in an amount not exceeding 5,000 gallons a day;
or
(g) Land application, so long as the ground water:
(A) Has first been appropriated and used under a permit or certificate  issued under ORS 537.625
or 537.630 for a water right issued  for industrial purposes or a water right authorizing use of water
for confined animal feeding purposes;
Enrolled Senate Bill 85 (SB 85-B) Page 7
(B) Is reused for irrigation  purposes and the period of irrigation is a period during which the
reused water has never been discharged to the waters of the state; and
(C) Is applied pursuant  to a permit issued by the Department of Environmental Quality or the
State Department of Agriculture  under either ORS 468B.050 to construct and operate a disposal
system or ORS 468B.215 to operate a confined animal feeding operation.
(2) A ground water use for a purpose that is exempt under subsection (1) of this section,  to the
extent that the use is beneficial, constitutes a  right to appropriate ground water equal to that es-
tablished by a ground water right certificate issued under ORS 537.700.
(3) Except for the use of water under subsection (1)(g) of this section, the Water  Resources
Commission by rule may require any person or public  agency using ground water for any such
purpose to furnish information with regard to such ground water  and the use thereof. For a use of
water described in subsection  (1)(g) of this section, the Department of Environmental Quality or the
State Department of Agriculture shall provide to the Water Resources Department a  copy of the
permit issued under ORS 468B.050 or 468B.215 authorizing the land application of ground  water for
reuse. The permit shall provide the information regarding the place of use of such water  and the
nature of the beneficial reuse.
(4) If  it is necessary for the Water Resources Department to regulate the use or distribution of
ground water, including uses for purposes  that are exempt under subsection (1) of this section, the
department shall use as a priority date for the exempt uses  the date indicated in the log for the well
filed with the department under ORS 537.765  or other documentation provided by the well owner
showing when water use began.
(5) The person licensed under ORS 537.747 or permitted under ORS 537.753 (4) that  constructs
a well to allow ground water use for a purpose that is exempt under subsection (1) of this  section
shall provide the Water Resources Department with a map  showing the exact location of the well
on the tax lot. The person licensed under ORS 537.747 or permitted under ORS 537.753  (4) that
constructs a well shall provide a map required by  this subsection to the department, along with the
well log required by ORS 537.765, no later than 30 days after  the well is completed. The map must
be prepared in accordance with standards  established by the department. The map and well log must
be accompanied by the fee  described in subsection (6) of this section to record the exempt ground
water use.
(6) The Water Resources Department shall collect  a fee of $300 for recording an exempt ground
water use under subsection (5) of this  section. Moneys from fees collected under this subsection
shall be deposited to the credit of the Water Resources Department Water  Right Operating Fund.
Notwithstanding ORS 536.009, moneys deposited to the fund under this subsection shall be  used for
the purposes of evaluating ground water  supplies, conducting ground water studies, carrying out
ground water monitoring, processing ground water  data and the administration and enforcement of
this subsection and subsections (3), (5) and (7) of this section.
(7) The Water Resources Commission shall adopt rules to implement,  administer and enforce
subsections (5) and (6) of this section.
SECTION 12. The amendments to ORS 537.545  by section 11 of this 2023 Act become op-
erative on September 15, 2027.
AIR QUALITY
SECTION 13. (1) Not more than 180 days after the United States Environmental Pro-
tection Agency  finalizes the National Air Emissions Monitoring Study, the Department of
Environmental Quality shall report, in the manner provided by  ORS 192.245, to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to agriculture on  the findings from the study
that relate to animal feeding operations.
(2) The report:
Enrolled Senate Bill 85 (SB 85-B) Page 8
(a) Must summarize how the findings  related to air emissions by confined animal feeding
operations may inform an understanding of emissions of air contaminants  by animal feeding
operations in Oregon.
(b) Must identify existing Oregon laws and rules, as well as  NPDES and WPCF permit
requirements, that pertain to the findings described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) May identify a process for developing recommendations to reduce emissions of air
contaminants by animal feeding operations, based on the results of the study  described in
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) As used in this section, “NPDES” and “WPCF” have the meanings given those  terms
in ORS 561.255.
LAND USE
SECTION 14. (1) Prior to applying for a permit under ORS 468B.050, an applicant  for a
proposed confined animal feeding operation shall request, from the  city or county in which
the confined  animal feeding operation is proposed to be located, a land use compatibility
statement that authorizes the land use.
(2) The land use compatibility statement must demonstrate  that the requested permit
pertains to a land use that is allowable as a permitted  or conditional use within the given
zoning designation where the land is located.
(3) The Department of Environmental Quality  or the State Department of Agriculture
may not issue the permit under ORS 468B.050 if  the land use compatibility statement dem-
onstrates that the proposed land use is prohibited in the applicable zone.
SECTION 15. Notwithstanding ORS 30.935, 215.253 (1) and 633.738, the governing body of
a city or county in which a new large confined animal feeding operation, as defined  in ORS
468B.215, is proposed to be located may require the new large  confined animal feeding oper-
ation to include a setback or buffer, composed of a  natural or created vegetative barrier,
berm or terrain, in the production area of the new large confined  animal feeding operation,
if the parcel of land on which the new large confined animal feeding operation  would be lo-
cated is adjacent to a parcel on which:
(1) A residential structure is lawfuly sited; or
(2) A structure  that was lawfully sited when constructed, but no longer conforms with
or is allowed under new or changed land use requirements, is sited.
APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 16.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the State Department of Agriculture by section 1 (3), chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled House Bill 5002), for the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, for natural resources, is
increased by  $562,012, for the costs of permitting large confined feeding animal operations
pursuant to sections 5, 7 and 14 of this 2023 Act and the  amendments to ORS 468B.050 and
468B.215 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 17. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5018), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for water quality, is
increased by  $214,491, for the costs of permitting large confined feeding animal operations
pursuant to sections 5, 7 and 14 of this 2023 Act and the  amendments to ORS 468B.050 and
468B.215 by sections 1 and 2 of this  2023 Act, and for the cost of implementing section 13 of
this 2023 Act.
CAPTIONS
Enrolled Senate Bill 85 (SB 85-B) Page 9
SECTION 18. The unit captions used in  this 2023 Act are provided for the convenience
of the  reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express any leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2023 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 19. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate June 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 21, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 85 (SB 85-B) Page 10